Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SUDC RESEARCH.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health to award competitive grants to applicants for research into sudden unexplained death in childhood (SUDC). The commissioner of health shall administer the grant program, including identifying promising research and innovations, developing grant outcomes and objectives with the goal of increasing understanding of the causes of SUDC and preventing such deaths, reviewing applications, and selecting grant recipients. Up to $....... may be used by the commissioner for grants to the Sudden Unexplained Death in Childhood Foundation or other similar organizations to award and administer competitive grants to applicants for research into SUDC under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, unencumbered balances under this section do not cancel until June 30, 2029. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner of health, the Sudden Unexplained Death in Childhood Foundation, and other similar organizations may use up to a total of five percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (b) Grants shall be awarded to support medical research related to SUDC. Research topics may include but are not limited to the causes of sudden unexplained death in childhood, the risk factors associated with SUDC, and strategies to prevent such deaths. new text end new text begin (c) Eligible applicants for the grants are research facilities, universities, and health systems located in Minnesota. Applicants must submit proposals to the commissioner or the Sudden Unexplained Death in Childhood Foundation, if applicable, in the time, form, and manner established by the commissioner. Applicants may coordinate research endeavors and submit a joint application. When reviewing the proposals, the commissioner and the Sudden Unexplained Death in Childhood Foundation, if applicable, shall attempt to avoid approving a grant for an applicant whose research is duplicative of an existing grantee's research. new text end new text begin (d) Beginning January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter until January 15, 2030, the commissioner shall submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health policy and finance a report specifying the applicants receiving grants under this section, the amount of each grant, the purposes for which the grant funds were used, and the amount of the appropriation that is unexpended. The report must also include relevant findings, results, and outcomes of the grant program, and any other information which the commissioner deems significant or useful. new text end